Missouri, session 2026, SB1664.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 191.2299, to read as
follows:
191.2299. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Honest Billing Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms shall
mean:
(1) "Campus", the same meaning as in 42 CFR 413.65(a),
as may be amended from time to time;
(2) "Enrollee", the same meaning as is ascribed to
such term in section 376.1350;
(3) "Facility", the same meaning as is ascribed to
such term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Health care service", the same meaning as is
ascribed to such term in section 376.1350;
(5) "Health carrier" or "carrier", the same meaning as
is ascribed to such term in section 376.1350;
(6) "National provider identifier" or "NPI", the
standard, unique health identifier for health care providers

SB 1664 2
that is issued by the National Plan and Provider Enumeration
System in accordance with 45 CFR 162;
(7) "Off-campus outpatient department of a facility",
a location:
(a) Whose operations are directly or indirectly owned
or controlled by, in whole or in part, or affiliated with, a
hospital, regardless of whether the operations are under the
same governing body as the hospital;
(b) That is located more than two hundred fifty yards
from the hospital's main campus;
(c) That provides services that are organizationally
and functionally integrated with the hospital; and
(d) That is an outpatient facility providing
preventive, diagnostic, treatment, or emergency services.
3. Except as otherwise specified in this section, this
section shall apply to all facilities licensed and operating
in this state and to all health carriers doing business in
this state. This section shall apply to claims submitted
after December 31, 2026.
4. Irrespective of 45 CFR 162.410(a)(1), each off-
campus outpatient department of a facility shall apply for,
obtain, and use, on all claims filed after the date
specified in subsection 3 of this section, for reimbursement
or payment for health care services provided in that
department, a unique NPI that is distinct from the NPI used
by the main campus of the facility and any other off-campus
location of the facility.
5. (1) No facility, or entity on behalf of a
facility, shall, with respect to health care services
furnished to an enrollee at an off-campus outpatient
department of a facility, submit a claim for such health
care services to a health carrier, or hold the enrollee

SB 1664 3
liable for such health care services, unless those health
care services are billed using the separate unique NPI
established for the off-campus outpatient department and on
a CMS 1500 form or a HIPAA X12 837P electronic claims
transaction or a successor form or transaction.
(2) No health carrier shall be responsible to
reimburse claims for health care services furnished to an
enrollee at an off-campus outpatient department of a
facility if such claims are not billed in accordance with
this subsection.
6. A facility, or entity on behalf of a facility, that
does not bill for health care services rendered to an
enrollee at an off-campus outpatient department of a
facility in accordance with this section shall not hold the
enrollee liable to pay for the health care services. A
violation of this subsection shall constitute a violation of
the Missouri merchandising practices act, sections 407.010
to 407.130, subject to enforcement by the attorney general.
7. A facility applying for a license or license
renewal by the state shall demonstrate that it has obtained
one or more NPIs as required under this section as a
condition of receiving licensure, and shall use its unique
NPI or NPIs on every claim for payment in the manner
required under this section.
8. The department of health and senior services may,
in accordance with chapter 536, impose penalties on any
licensee violating any of the provisions of this section by
taking any or all of the following actions, separately or in
combination:
(1) Imposing an administrative fine of one thousand
dollars for each violation of this section;

SB 1664 4
(2) Recovering reasonable investigative fees and costs
incurred as a consequence of the violation or violations;
(3) Suspending, revoking, or denying the issuance or
renewal of a license;
(4) Placing conditions on a license;
(5) Placing a licensee on probation;
(6) Referring a licensee to the attorney general for
investigation; and
(7) Requiring the provider to post information about
these penalties on the main page of its website.
9. The director of the department of commerce and
insurance shall have authority to refer any violation of
this section to the department of health and senior
services. The attorney general shall have authority to
enforce the provisions of this section.
10. The director of the department of commerce and
insurance may promulgate rules as necessary for the
implementation of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
100 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
101 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
102 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
103 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
104 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
105 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
106 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
107 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
108 August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓